Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.190

Aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing—Program review—Analysis of training system.

(1) By September 1, 2012, and each September 1st thereafter, the workforce training and education coordinating board, working with the state board for community and technical colleges, shall evaluate the programs recommended for review by the aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing pipeline advisory committee under RCW 28B.50.903. This evaluation shall include the outcome results both for the persons receiving the training and the employers.

(2) By September 1, 2016, and every four years thereafter, the workforce training and education coordinating board shall conduct and complete an analysis of the results of the training system for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing. This analysis shall include but not be limited to a specific net-impact and cost-benefit evaluation of the training system for the aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing industry and the outcome results both for the persons receiving the training and the employers.

(3) All requirements in this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the specific purposes described.

[ 2012 c 50 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2012 c 50: See note following RCW 28B.50.903.